Washington statutes.
RCW 27.12.170

Intercounty rural library districts—Powers of board—Procedures.

Except as otherwise specifically provided intercounty rural library districts and the trustees thereof shall have the same powers as are prescribed by RCW 27.12.040 through 27.12.070, for rural county library districts and shall follow the same procedures and be subject to the same limitations as are provided therein with respect to the contracting of indebtedness.

[ 1947 c 75 s 9; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 8246-9.]